District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.10

Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of the District may enforce a child-support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of the District, but the registered support order may be modified only if the requirements of § 46-356.11 or § 46-356.13 have been met.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 610, 63 DCR 222